extras/dictionaries/la.dic
abruptus/abcrs
absonus/abcrs
absurdus/abcrs
acclivis/fgqrs
accuratus/abcrs
acervalis/fgqrs
adclivis/fgqrs
adfirmatus/abcrs
adiunctus/abcrs
adpetentis/dfrs
adsiduus/abcrs
adtentus/abcrs
adulantis/fgrs
adustus/abcrs
aegri/abcr
aequalis/fgqrst
aequus/abcrs
aeternus/abcrs
affectatus/abcrs
affirmatus/abcrs
agitatus/abcrs
alacris/fgrt
albus/abcrs
alsus/abcr
amantis/defgrs
ambagiosus/abcrs
amicalis/fgqrst
amplus/abcrs
animaequus/abcrs
antelongus/abcr
apalus/abcrs
appetentis/fgrst
appotus/abcrs
apricus/abcrs
aquatus/abcrs
ardentis/fgrs
argumentosus/abcrs
arrectus/abcrs
aspectabilis/fgqrs
asseverantis/fgrst
assuetus/abcrs
atrocis/fgrst
attractus/abcrs
audacis/fgrs
austerus/abcrs
avorsus/abcrs
bellacis/fqrs
beneficus/abcrs
benificus/abcrs
blandus/abcrs
caenosus/abcrs
calidus/abcrs
caloratus/abcrs
canorus/abcrs
captiosus/abcrs
castus/abcrs
cautus/abcrs
celsus/abcrs
circumscriptus/abcrs
citerior/qr
clarus/abcrs
cognatus/abcrs
cohaerentis/defgrs
collectus/abcrs
coloratus/abcrs
commendatus/abcrs
commoventis/fgrs
comparabilis/fgqrst
competentis/fgrs
competentis/fqrs
comptus/abcrs
conceptus/abcrs
concinnus/abcrs
conclusus/abcrs
concultus/abcrs
concupiscibilis/fgqrst
condecibilis/fgqrst
conditus/abcrs
confirmatus/abcrs
confragosus/abcrs
conglobatus/abcrs
conlaudabilis/fgqrs
conmemorabilis/fgqrst
conmodatus/abcrs
conmunis/fgqrt
conpertus/abcrs
conpluris/fgrs
conprobabilis/fgqrst
conreptus/abcrs
conruptus/abcrs
consideratus/abcrs
consociatus/abcrs
conspiciendus/abcr
consuetus/abcrs
contemnificus/abcrs
contentus/abcrs
continuatus/abcrs
controversus/abcrs
convenientis/fgrs
copis/fqrs
corpulentis/fgrs
corrumptus/abcrs
crassus/abcrs
cremialis/fgqr
crispantis/fgrs
cruciabilis/fgqrst
cruentus/abcrs
cumulatus/abcrs
cupidus/abcrs
curiosus/abcrs
curvatus/abcr
daemoniosus/abcrs
dealbatus/abcrs
declinis/fgqr
decoloratus/abcrs
dedecorus/abcr
defaecabilis/fgqrst
defecabilis/fgqrst
deformis/fgqrst
delassabilis/fgqrst
deliberatus/abcrs
deminutus/abcrs
denotabilis/fgqrst
deorbatus/abcrs
deprehensibilis/fgqrst
derivabilis/fgqrst
desertus/abcrs
desideratus/abcrs
despectus/abcrs
despuentis/fqrs
deterior/qr
devexus/abcrs
dexteri/abcr
diasyrticus/abcrs
differentis/fgrs
difluus/abcrs
digestorius/abcrs
dignitosus/abcrs
diligentis/fgrs
directus/abcrs
disciplinabilis/fgqrst
discordis/fgqrs
dsicriminosus/abcrs
disparilis/fgqrst
displicitus/abcrs
dissimilis/fgqrst
dissolutus/abcrs
distortus/abcrs
diutior/qr
divitis/ders
divisus/abcrs
docibilis/fgqrst
dolatilis/fgqrst
dubitabilis/fgqrst
dulcisonorus/abcr
durabilis/fgqrst
ebriulatus/abcrs
ecfectus/abcrs
ecferus/abcrs
ecficientis/fgrst
ecfluxus/abcrs
ecfusus/abcrs
editus/abcrs
effectuosus/abcrs
effertus/abcrs
efficilis/fgqrst
effrenatus/abcrs
egelidus/abcrs
egestuosus/abcrs
elaboratus/abcrs
electus/abcrs
elleborosus/abcrs
elucentis/fgrst
elumbis/fgqrs
emendabilis/fgqrst
emolumenticius/abcrs
enervus/abcrs
ensipotentis/fgrs
erraticus/abcrs
ethicus/abcrs
exactus/abcrs
exaridus/abcrs
excitabilis/fgqrst
excrescentius/abcrs
excussus/abcrs
exercitatus/abcrs
exhortatorius/abcrs
existimabilis/fgqrst
exornatus/abcrs
expavidus/abcrs
experimentosus/abcrs
expetibilis/fgqrst
expletus/abcrs
exploratus/abcrs
expretus/abcrs
expudoratus/abcrs
exsaturabilis/fgqrst
exsecratus/abcrs
exsiccatus/abcrs
exspectatus/abcrs
exsuccidus/abcrs
exsultabundus/abcrs
extemporalis/fgqrst
extenuatus/abcrs
extumidus/abcrs
exultantis/fgqrst
fabulosus/abcrs
facinorosus/abcrs
faeneratus/abcrs
fallacis/defgrst
famatus/abcrs
famulatorius/abcrs
fatalis/fgqrst
faustus/abcrs
fecundus/abcrs
fertus/abcrs
festivus/abcrs
fidus/abcrs
fixus/abcrs
flammeus/abcrs
flexibilis/fgrst
floreus/abcrs
fluidus/abcrs
foetosus/abcrs
formidus/abcrs
fragosus/abcrs
frequentis/fgrst
frugalis/fgqrst
fugitantis/fgrst
funestus/abcrs
furiacis/fgrst
gaudialis/fgqrst
geniatus/abcrs
glabrus/abcrs
gloriabilis/fgqrst
gluttus/abcrs
gracilis/fgqrst
gratiosus/abcrs
gubernabilis/fgqrst
harenosus/abcrs
hiemalis/fgqrst
hispidus/abcrs
honorus/abcrs
hosticus/abcrs
idealis/fgqrst
ignorantis/fgrst
illepidus/abcrs
illustris/fgqrst
immaculatus/abcrs
immiserabilis/fgqrst
immotus/abcrs
imparentis/fgrst
imperceptus/abcrs
imperturbabilis/fgqrst
implacabilis/fgqrst
importunus/abcrs
improbus/abcrs
impudentis/fgrst
inaequalis/fgqrst
inbecillis/fgqrst
incertus/abcrs
inclementis/fgrst
inconsultus/abcrs
incusus/abcrs
indisputabilis/fgqrst
inefficacis/fgrst
infacundus/abcrs
infer/abcrs
inficientis/fgrst
infortunatus/abcrs
ingloriosus/abcrs
inhonorus/abcrs
iniunctus/abcrs
inluminatus/abcrs
inmerentis/fgrst
inmoderatus/abcrs
inmutabilis/fgqrst
inoptabilis/fgqrst
inpassibilis/fgqrst
inperitus/abcrs
inpius/abcrs
inportabilis/fgqrst
inprobatus/abcrs
inprovidus/abcrs
inquietus/abcrs
inrisivus/abcrs
inscitus/abcrs
insipientis/fgrst
instabilis/fgqrst
insuetus/abcrs
intemeratus/abcrs
interritus/abcrs
inutilis/fgqrst
invidus/abcrs
iocundus/abcrs
irrevocabilis/fgqrst
iureconsultus/abcrs
laboratus/abcrs
laciniosus/abcrs
laetabilis/fgqrst
lamentosus/abcrs
lasciviosus/abcrs
laudatus/abcrs
leibertus/abcrs
levis/fgqrst
limatus/abcrs
locutilis/fgqrst
lotilentus/abcrs
lucrosus/abcrs
macri/abcr
magnidicus/abcrs
malefabri/abcr
maliloquacis/fgrst
maturus/abcrs
meracus/abcrs
minor/qr
mixtus/abcrs
molestus/abcrs
narus/abcrs
negligentis/fgqrst
nominatus/abcrs
noxius/abcrs
oblongus/abcrs
obsoletus/abcrs
occiduus/abcrs
odorus/abcrs
operantis/fgrs
opulentus/abcrs
pacatus/abcrs
palpabilis/fgqrst
pannucius/abcrs
parentis/fgrst
passibilis/fgqrst
paticus/abcrs
paucus/abcrs
pauxillulus/abcrs
peculiaris/fgqrst
pedisequus/abcr
pennatus/abcrs
peracerbus/abcrs
peramicus/abcrs
peraridus/abcrs
perblandus/abcrs
percipibilis/fgqrst
percrassus/abcrs
perdifficilis/fgqrst
perdoctus/abcrs
pereruditus/abcrs
perfacilis/fgqrst
perfidelis/fgqrst
perfletus/abcrs
perfunctorius/abcrs
perhonestus/abcrs
perimbecillus/abcrs
perindulgentis/fgrst
perinlustris/fgqrst
periuriosus/abcrs
perlippidus/abcrs
perlusorius/abcrs
permitis/fgqrst
pernicialis/fgqrst
perodiatus/abcrs
perpallidus/abcrs
perperus/abcrs
perpinguis/fgqrs
perprosperi/abcr
perreconditus/abcrs
persapientis/fgrst
perseverus/abcrs
perspicacis/fgrst
persubtilis/fgqrst
pertinacis/fgrst
perturbidus/abcrs
pervarius/abcrs
pervigilis/fgqrst
pestibilis/fgqrst
petiginosus/abcrs
phlegmaticus/abcrs
pinifer/abcrs
pitinnus/abcrs
placidus/abcrs
plausibilis/fgqrst
plexibilis/fgqrst
pluviosus/abcrs
pollucibilis/fgqrst
pompatus/abcrs
porrectus/abcrs
potentis/fgrs
potis/fgqrst
praecelsus/abcrs
praecupidus/abcrs
praegnatis/fgrst
praemundatus/abcrs
praesauciatus/abcrs
praestantis/fgrst
praesumptus/abcrs
praevalentis/fgrst
preciosus/abcrs
priscus/abcrs
probus/abcrs
prodigiosus/abcrs
profligatus/abcrs
promercalis/fgqrs
pronus/abcrs
propitiabilis/fgqrst
prosperus/abcrs
providus/abcrs
pruritivus/abcrs
pulcri/abcr
pusillanimus/abcrs
putruosus/abcrs
radiatilis/fgqrst
ratus/abcrs
redolentior/r
regibilis/fgqrs
remissus/abcrs
resolutus/abcrs
reverentis/fgrs
rubentis/fgrs
saevus/abcrs
salutaris/fgqrst
sapidus/abcrs
saturatus/abcrs
scaevus/abcrs
scibilis/fgqrst
scruposus/abcrs
sectarius/abcrs
seductibilis/fgqrst
senectus/abcrs
sententiosus/abcrs
sequior/qr
sessilis/fgqrst
silentiosus/abcrs
sincerus/abcrs
sobrius/abcrs
solicitus/abcrs
solutus/abcrs
sonorus/abcrs
soubtilis/fgqrst
speculabilis/fgqrst
spissus/abcrs
spurcidicus/abcrs
stercoratus/abcrs
strictus/abcrs
subacris/fgrt
subdolus/abcrs
sublestus/abcrs
submorosus/abcrs
subrefectus/abcrs
substrepentis/fgrt
subturpiculus/abcr
sudus/abcrs
suffusus/abcrs
superabilis/fgqrst
superstitiosus/abcrs
suspectus/abcrs
tabidosus/abcrs
tangibalis/fgqr
temerabilis/fgqrs
temulentus/abcrs
tensibilis/fgqrst
terrisonus/abcr
thymosus/abcrs
tiniosus/abcrs
tolutilis/fgqr
tortilis/fgqrs
tractuosus/abcrs
transitorius/abcrs
tremulus/abcrs
trivialis/fgqrst
tumidus/abcrs
turgidus/abcrs
ulcerosus/abcrs
umorosus/abcrs
undabundus/abcrs
unianimis/fgqrst
urgentis/fgrst
utilis/fgqrst
valerudinarius/abcrs
varius/abcrs
vendibilis/fgqrst
verberabilis/fgqrst
vertibilis/fgqrst
viabilis/fgqrst
vilis/fgqrst
vivacis/fgrst
voluptabilis/fgqrs
ziabolicus/abcrs
